Illinois, session 104th, HB1607.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Task 5Force on Eliminating Food Deserts Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Food desert" means a geographic area where people have 8limited access to affordable, healthy, and nutritious food. 9"Food desert" includes a food desert as defined by Economic 10Research Report Number 140 of the Economic Research Service of 11the U.S. Department of Agriculture, August 2012.12    "Task Force" means the Task Force on Eliminating Food 13Deserts established under this Act. 14    "Task Force member" means a task force member on the Task 15Force, as listed in subsection (b) of Section 10 of this Act.  16    Section 10. Task Force on Eliminating Food Deserts. 17    (a) The Task Force on Eliminating Food Deserts is 18established in the Department of Public Health for the 19following purposes: 20        (1) to review the effectiveness of current State-led 21    efforts to eliminate food deserts in Illinois; and 22        (2) to advise the General Assembly on policy, funding,   HB1607 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07687 BDA 17731 b1    initiatives, and best practices for the elimination of 2    food deserts in Illinois. 3    (b) The Task Force shall consist of the following members: 4        (1) the Director of Public Health or the Director's 5    designee, who shall serve as chairperson; 6        (2) the Secretary of Human Services or the Secretary's 7    designee; 8        (3) the Director of Aging or the Director's designee; 9        (4) the Director of Agriculture or the Director's 10    designee; 11        (5) the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 12    or the Director's designee, who shall serve as an ex 13    officio, nonvoting, advisory member; 14        (6) one task force member who is a representative of 15    the University of Illinois Extension, appointed by the 16    Director of Extension and Outreach in the College of 17    Agricultural, Consumer, and Environmental Sciences at the 18    University of Illinois; 19        (7) one member of the Senate, appointed by the 20    President of the Senate; 21        (8) one member of the House of Representatives, 22    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; 23        (9) one member of the Senate, appointed by the Senate 24    Minority Leader; 25        (10) one member of the House of Representatives, 26    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of   HB1607 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07687 BDA 17731 b1    Representatives; 2        (11) one task force member who is a representative of 3    a county government of a county in Illinois with a 4    population equal to or greater than 1,000,000 people, 5    appointed by the Governor; 6        (12) one task force member who is a representative of 7    a county government of a county in Illinois with a 8    population fewer than 1,000,000 people but equal to or 9    greater than 500,000 people, appointed by the Governor; 10        (13) one task force member who is a representative of 11    a county government of a county in Illinois with a 12    population fewer than 500,000 people, appointed by the 13    Governor; 14        (14) one task force member who is involved in 15    agriculture in Illinois, appointed by the Governor; 16        (15) one task force member who is a representative of 17    a food retailer in Illinois, appointed by the Governor; 18        (16) one task force member who is a representative of 19    retailers in Illinois, appointed by the Governor; 20        (17) eight task force members who reside in food 21    deserts in Illinois, appointed by the Governor;22        (18) four task force members who are representatives 23    of non-profit organizations in food deserts in Illinois, 24    appointed by the Governor; and 25        (19) one task force member who is a representative of 26    labor organizations, appointed by the Governor.  HB1607 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07687 BDA 17731 b1    (c) The Task Force shall convene and meet at the call of 2the chairperson and shall meet as frequently as necessary to 3carry out its duties as required by this Act. 4    (d) The Department of Public Health shall provide 5administrative and other support to the Task Force. 6    (e) Task force members shall serve without compensation 7but shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and necessary 8expenses from funds appropriated for that purpose. 9    (f) The Task Force shall submit a report to the Governor 10and the General Assembly on or before January 1, 2028. The 11substance of the report shall include the number or amount of 12food deserts in this State, shall address the purposes of the 13Task Force in subsection (a) of this Section, and shall 14provide any other advice or recommendations of the Task Force. 15After submitting the report, the chairperson of the Task Force 16shall:17        (1) file with the Index Department of the Office of 18    the Secretary of State a declaration that the Task Force 19    on Eliminating Food Deserts shall be dissolved;20        (2) notify the Clerk of the House of Representatives 21    of the filing described in paragraph (1) on the day that it 22    occurs;23        (3) notify the Secretary of the Senate of the filing 24    described in paragraph (1) on the day that it occurs; and 25        (4) notify the Executive Director of the Legislative 26    Reference Bureau of the filing described in paragraph (1)   HB1607 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07687 BDA 17731 b1    on the day that it occurs.2    Upon such filing and notification, this Act is repealed 3and the Task Force is dissolved as provided in Section 15 of 4this Act. 5    Section 15. Repeal. This Act is repealed and the Task 6Force on Eliminating Food Deserts is dissolved upon the 7occurrence of the conditions set forth in subsection (f) of 8Section 10 of this Act.